Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.26] CLIMATE JUSTICE INSTRUCTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Model program. new text end new text begin (a) "Climate justice" as used in this section means a framework that puts people first and views the effects of climate change as interconnected with forms of oppression connecting climate change to social and economic justice issues. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of education must, in consultation with the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency, environmental organizations, teachers, and other qualified experts, provide a climate justice model program for elementary and secondary school students aligned with current scientific research. The model program must be consistent with state academic standards under section 120B.021. The commissioner must, by July 1, 2026, and July 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter, provide school districts and charter schools with access to the model program, including resources compiled by Minnesota environmental advocates and proper training for instructors. new text end new text begin (c) A model program must include climate justice content that: is scientifically accurate; is age, disability, and developmentally accessible; is inclusive of underrepresented students; encourages sharing and comprehension of climate justice stories; and is grounded in science and intersectionality on: new text end new text begin (1) human activities causing climate change and the risk to all life forms; new text end new text begin (2) climate change's disproportionate effects on communities facing systemic oppression, specifically Black, Indigenous, and other persons of color; people with disabilities; and low-income communities globally; new text end new text begin (3) the relationship between systemic change and accessible environmental stewardship; and new text end new text begin (4) the growing number of economic and environmental solutions, which should be led by communities most impacted by the climate crisis. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin School programs. new text end new text begin (a) Starting in the 2026-2027 school year, a school district or charter school must implement a climate justice education program for students in elementary and secondary school, including students with disabilities and students enrolled in a state-approved alternative program. The climate justice education program must include instruction on the topics listed in subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) A school district or charter school must report to the commissioner of education in the form and manner determined by the commissioner information regarding its implementation of a climate justice education program, including whether the district or charter school implemented a model program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Parental review. new text end new text begin A school district or charter school must provide instruction and curriculum under this section consistent with the parental curriculum review requirements in section 120B.20. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin CLIMATE JUSTICE EDUCATION REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education on the climate justice education program required under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.26. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) a description of how the model climate justice education program or programs were identified; new text end new text begin (2) assistance provided to school districts and charter schools implementing a climate justice education program; and new text end new text begin (3) the number of school districts and charter schools that adopted the model program. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must submit the report no later than January 31, 2027, and must submit the report in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end